Indiana, session 2026, SB50.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-31-13.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13.2. Tenant Applications and Credit Screenings
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "applicant" means an individual
who has submitted an application to a landlord for the rental of a
rental unit in Indiana.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "consumer report" means any
written, oral, or other communication of any information that:
(1) is made by a consumer reporting agency;
(2) bears on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing,
credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal
characteristics, or mode of living; and
(3) is used or expected to be used or collected in whole or in
part for the purpose of serving as a factor in establishing a
consumer's eligibility for:
(A) credit or insurance to be used primarily for personal,
2026 IN 50—LS 6220/DI 154


family, or household purposes;
(B) employment purposes; or
(C) any other purpose authorized under Section 604 of the
federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. 1681b).
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "consumer reporting agency"
means any person that, for monetary fees or dues, or on a
cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part
in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit
information or other information on consumers for the purpose of
furnishing a consumer report to third parties.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "credit score" means a numerical
value or a categorization that:
(1) is derived from a statistical tool or modeling system; and
(2) is used to predict the likelihood of certain credit behaviors,
including default;
regardless of whether the numerical value or categorization is
referred to as a credit score, risk predictor, risk score, or some
other term, or by a proprietary name.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "hard inquiry"means an inquiry
that:
(1) is made by a landlord to:
(A) a consumer reporting agency; or
(B) a specialty consumer reporting agency;
for an applicant's consumer report or for information in an
applicant's consumer report;
(2) is noted on the consumer report of the applicant for a
period of time following the inquiry; and
(3) negatively impacts the applicant's credit score.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "landlord" means:
(1) the owner, lessor, or sublessor of a rental unit; or
(2) a person authorized to exercise any aspect of the
management of a rental unit.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "rental unit" has the meaning set
forth in IC 32-31-3-8.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "specialty consumer reporting
agency" means a consumer reporting agency that compiles and
maintains files on consumers relating to residential or tenant
history.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "tenant screening report" means
a report that:
(1) is prepared from files compiled and maintained with
respect to an applicant; and
2026 IN 50—LS 6220/DI 154


(2) describes the applicant's credit characteristics, rental
history, or criminal history.
Sec. 10. A landlord may not do either of the following in
connection with an applicant's application for the rental of a rental
unit:
(1) Make a hard inquiry to:
(A) a consumer reporting agency; or
(B) a specialty consumer reporting agency;
for an applicant's consumer report or for information in an
applicant's consumer report.
(2) Obtain or use a tenant screening report that includes
information that is obtained through a hard inquiry to:
(A) a consumer reporting agency; or
(B) a specialty consumer reporting agency;
for an applicant's consumer report or for information in an
applicant's consumer report.
Sec. 11. A landlord that violates section 10 of this chapter
commits a deceptive act that is actionable by an applicant and the
attorney general under IC 24-5-0.5-4.
2026 IN 50—LS 6220/DI 154